California statutes. Corporations Code
 date for compliance and shall be sent to the last address of the corporation according to the records of the Secretary of State or to the last electronic mail address according to the records of the Secretary of State if the corporation has elected to receive notices from the Secretary of State by electronic mail. The failure of the corporation to receive the notice is not an excuse for failure to comply with this section.

(e) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) is changed, the corporation may file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). In order to change its agent for service of process or the address of the agent, the corporation must file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). Whenever any statement is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed statement and the statement in the articles as to
 the agent for service of process and the address of the agent.

(f) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded by the filing of a new statement.

(g) This section shall not be construed to place any person dealing with the corporation on notice of, or under any duty to inquire about, the existence or content of a statement filed pursuant to this section.

(h) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall be available and open to the public for inspection. The Secretary of State shall provide access to all information contained in this statement by means of an online database.

(i) In addition to any other fees required, a corporation shall pay a five-dollar ($5)
 disclosure fee when filing the statement required by subdivision (a). One-half of the fee shall, notwithstanding Section 12176 of the Government Code, be deposited into the Business Programs Modernization Fund established in subdivision (k), and one-half shall be deposited into the Victims of Corporate Fraud Compensation Fund established in Section 2280.

(j) A corporation shall certify that the information it provides pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is true and correct. No claim may be made against the state for inaccurate information contained in the statements.

(k) There is hereby established the Business Programs Modernization Fund in the State Treasury. Moneys deposited into the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available to the Secretary of State to further the purposes of this section, including the development and maintenance of the online database
 required by subdivision (h), and by subdivision (c) of Section 2117.

(l) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022, or upon certification by the Secretary of State that California Business Connect is implemented, whichever date is earlier.

(2) If the Secretary of State certifies California Business Connect is implemented prior to January 1, 2022, the Secretary of State shall post notice of the certification on the homepage of its internet website and send notice of the certification to the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   (AB 3075)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally operative on or before January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.1.

(a) In addition to the statement required pursuant to Section 1502, every publicly traded corporation shall file annually, within 150 days after the end of its fiscal year, a statement, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that includes all of the following information:

(1) The name of the independent auditor that prepared the most recent auditor’s report on the corporation’s annual financial statements.

(2) A description of other services, if any, performed for the corporation during its two most recent fiscal years and the period between the end of its most recent fiscal year and the date of the statement by the foregoing independent auditor, by its parent corporation, or by a subsidiary
 or corporate affiliate of the independent auditor or its parent corporation.

(3) The name of the independent auditor employed by the corporation on the date of the statement, if different from the independent auditor listed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) The compensation for the most recent fiscal year of the corporation paid to each member of the board of directors and paid to each of the five most highly compensated executive officers of the corporation who are not members of the board of directors, including the number of any shares issued, options for shares granted, and similar equity-based compensation granted to each of those persons. If the chief executive officer is not among the five most highly compensated executive officers of the corporation, the compensation paid to the chief executive officer shall also be included.

(5) A description of any loan, including the amount and terms of the loan, made to any member of the board of directors by the corporation during the corporation’s two most recent fiscal years at an interest rate lower than the interest rate available from unaffiliated commercial lenders generally to a similarly-situated borrower.

(6) A statement indicating whether an order for relief has been entered in a bankruptcy case with respect to the corporation, its executive officers, or members of the board of directors of the corporation during the 10 years preceding the date of the statement.

(7) A statement indicating whether any member of the board of directors or executive officer of the corporation was convicted of fraud during the 10 years preceding the date of the statement, if the conviction has not been overturned or
 expunged.

(8) A description of any material pending legal proceedings, other than ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, to which the corporation or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any of their property is the subject, as specified by Item 103 of Regulation S-K of the Securities and Exchange Commission (Section 229.103 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations). A description of any material legal proceeding during which the corporation was found legally liable by entry of a final judgment or final order that was not overturned on appeal during the five years preceding the date of the statement.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Publicly traded corporation” means a corporation, as defined in Section 162, that is an issuer as defined in Section
 3 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78c), and has at least one class of securities listed or admitted for trading on a national securities exchange, on the OTC Bulletin Board, or on the electronic service operated by OTC Markets Group Inc.

(2) “Executive officer” means the chief executive officer, president, any vice president in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function, any other officer of the corporation who performs a policymaking function, or any other person who performs similar policymaking functions for the corporation.

(3) “Compensation” as used in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) means all plan and nonplan compensation awarded to, earned by, or paid to the person for all services rendered in all capacities to the corporation and to its subsidiaries, as the compensation is specified by Item 402 of Regulation S-K of the
 Securities and Exchange Commission (Section 229.402 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(4) “Loan” as used in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) excludes an advance for expenses permitted under subdivision (d) of Section 315, the corporation’s payment of life insurance premiums permitted under subdivision (e) of Section 315, and an advance of expenses permitted under Section 317.

(c) This statement shall be available and open to the public for inspection. The Secretary of State shall provide access to all information contained in this statement by means of an online database.

(d) A corporation shall certify that the information it provides pursuant to this section is true and correct. No claim may be made against the state for inaccurate information contained in statements filed under this section with the
 Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 25.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

(a) An agent designated for service of process pursuant to Section 202, 1502, 2105, or 2117 may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process. The form shall contain the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that the agent is resigning. Thereupon the authority of the agent to act in such capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State forthwith shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the corporation at its principal office.

(b) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number for the corporation, and the name of the resigning agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent. Similarly, a person named as an officer or director may indicate that the person was never properly appointed as the officer or director.

(c) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new form is filed pursuant to Section 1502 or 2117 replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 26.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

If a natural person who has been designated agent for service of process pursuant to Section 202, 1502, 2105, or 2117 dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state or if the corporate agent for such purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers and privileges suspended or ceases to exist, the corporation shall forthwith file a designation of a new agent conforming to the requirements of Section 1502 or 2117.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 764, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

(a) Any domestic or foreign corporation, before it may be designated as the agent for the purpose of service of process of any entity pursuant to any law which refers to this section, shall file a certificate executed in the name of the corporation by an officer thereof stating all of the following:

(1) The complete street address of its
 office or offices in this state, wherein any entity designating it as such agent may be served with process.

(2) The name of each person employed by it at each such office to whom it authorizes the delivery of a copy of any such process.

(3) Its consent that delivery thereof to any such person at the office where the person is employed shall constitute delivery of any such copy to it, as such agent.

(b) Any corporation which has filed the certificate provided for in subdivision (a) may file any number of supplemental certificates containing all the statements provided for in subdivision (a), which, upon the filing thereof, shall supersede the statements contained in the original or in any supplemental certificate previously filed.

(c) No domestic or
 foreign corporation may file a certificate pursuant to this section unless it is currently authorized to engage in business in this state and is in good standing on the records of the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 8.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1506.

Upon request of an assessor, a domestic or foreign corporation owning, claiming, possessing or controlling property in this state subject to local assessment shall make available at the corporation’s principal office in California or at a place mutually acceptable to the assessor and the corporation a true copy of business records relevant to the amount, cost and value of all property that it owns, claims, possesses or controls within the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1507.

Any officers, directors, employees or agents of a corporation who do any of the following are liable jointly and severally for all the damages resulting therefrom to the corporation or any person injured thereby who relied thereon or to both:

(a) Make, issue, deliver or publish any prospectus, report, circular, certificate, financial statement, balance sheet, public notice or document respecting the corporation or its shares, assets, liabilities, capital, dividends, business, earnings or accounts which is false in any material respect, knowing it to be false, or participate in the making, issuance, delivery or
 publication thereof with knowledge that the same is false in a material respect.

(b) Make or cause to be made in the books, minutes, records or accounts of a corporation any entry which is false in any material particular knowing such entry is false.

(c) Remove, erase, alter or cancel any entry in any books or records of the corporation, with intent to deceive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1508.

The Attorney General, upon complaint that a foreign or domestic corporation is failing to comply with the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 600), 7 (commencing with Section 700), or 16 (commencing with Section 1600), may in the name of the people of the State of California send to the principal office of such corporation notice of the complaint. If the answer is not satisfactory, the Attorney General may institute, maintain or intervene in such suits, actions or proceedings of any type in any court or tribunal of competent jurisdiction or before any administrative agency for such relief by way of injunction, the dissolution of entities, the appointment of receivers or any other temporary,
 preliminary, provisional or final remedies as may be appropriate to protect the rights of shareholders or to undo the consequences of failure to comply with such requirements. In any such action, suit or proceeding there may be joined as parties all persons and entities responsible for or affected by such activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 27.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1509.

For a period of 60 days following the conclusion of an annual, regular, or special meeting of shareholders, a corporation shall, upon written request from a shareholder, forthwith inform the shareholder of the result of any particular vote of shareholders taken at the meeting, including the number of shares voting for, the number of shares voting against, and the number of shares abstaining or withheld from voting. If the matter voted on was the election of directors, the corporation shall report the number of shares (or votes if voted cumulatively) cast for each nominee for director. If more than one class or series of shares voted, the report shall state
 the appropriate numbers by class and series of shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1510.

(a) Any foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state shall provide the information specified in Section 1509, at the request of a shareholder resident in this state.

(b) Any of the following shall be considered to be a shareholder resident in this state:

(1) A natural person residing in this state.

(2) A bank organized under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code, whether acting for itself,
 acting as a sole fiduciary, or acting with one or more other persons as a fiduciary.

(3) A national bank having its head office in this state whether acting for itself, acting as a sole fiduciary, or acting with one or more other persons as a fiduciary.

(4) Any retirement fund for public employees established or authorized by any law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1511.

Any foreign corporation which is not qualified to transact intrastate business in this state but has one or more subsidiaries which are domestic corporations or foreign corporations qualified to transact intrastate business in this state shall provide the information specified in Section 1509, at the request of a shareholder resident in this state, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1510.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 408, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1512.

(a) For the purposes of Sections 1509, 1510, and 1511, a shareholder includes (1) any person named in a share certificate as a shareholder or (2) any person named as a shareholder on the records of a central depository, bank, or broker-dealer with respect to shares which are subject to the control of the central depository, bank, or broker-dealer.

(b) A beneficiary of a trust, a beneficiary of the estate of a decedent, or an employee with respect to a pension, retirement, or health care trust or fund is not a shareholder of any
 shares standing in the name of the trust, the fund, the decedent, or the estate of the decedent.

(c) A person who is a shareholder by reason of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall provide the corporation with a photocopy of a receipt of a statement from the central depository, bank, or broker-dealer showing the person to be a shareholder and the corporation shall accept the photocopy as sufficient evidence thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 408, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Rights of Inspection [1600. - 1605.]

1600.

(a) A shareholder or shareholders holding at least 5 percent in the aggregate of the outstanding voting shares of a corporation or who hold at least 1 percent of those voting shares and have filed a Schedule 14A with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission shall have an absolute right to do either or both of the following: (1) inspect and copy the record of shareholders’ names and addresses and shareholdings during usual business hours upon five business days’ prior written demand upon the corporation, or (2) obtain from the transfer agent for the corporation, upon written demand and upon the tender of its usual charges for such a list (the amount of which charges shall be stated to the
 shareholder by the transfer agent upon request), a list of the shareholders’ names and addresses, who are entitled to vote for the election of directors, and their shareholdings, as of the most recent record date for which it has been compiled or as of a date specified by the shareholder subsequent to the date of demand. The list shall be made available on or before the later of five business days after the demand is received or the date specified therein as the date as of which the list is to be compiled. A corporation shall have the responsibility to cause its transfer agent to comply with this subdivision.

(b) Any delay by the corporation or the transfer agent in complying with a demand under subdivision (a) beyond the time limits specified therein shall give the shareholder or shareholders properly making the demand a right to obtain from
 the superior court, upon the filing of a verified complaint in the proper county and after a hearing, notice of which shall be given to such persons and in such manner as the court may direct, an order postponing any shareholders’ meeting previously noticed for a period equal to the period of such delay. Such right shall be in addition to any other legal or equitable remedies to which the shareholder may be entitled.

(c) The record of shareholders shall also be open to inspection and copying by any shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate at any time during usual business hours upon written demand on the corporation, for a purpose reasonably related to such holder’s interests as a shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate.

(d) Any inspection and
 copying under this section may be made in person or by agent or attorney. The rights provided in this section
 may not be limited by the articles or bylaws. This section applies to any domestic corporation and to any foreign corporation having its principal office in California or customarily holding meetings of its board in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 28.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

(a) (1) The accounting books, records, and minutes of proceedings of the shareholders and the board and committees of the board of any domestic corporation, and of any foreign corporation keeping any records in this state or having its principal office in California, or a true and accurate copy thereof if the original has been lost, destroyed, or is not normally physically located within this state shall be open to inspection at the corporation’s principal office in California, or if none, at the physical location for the corporation’s registered agent for service of process in this state, upon the written demand on the corporation of any shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate at any reasonable time during usual
 business hours, for a purpose reasonably related to the holder’s interests as a shareholder or as the holder of a voting trust certificate.

(2) As an alternative to the procedure in subdivision (a), the shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate may elect to request that the corporation produce the books, records, and minutes by mail or electronically, if the shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate pays for the reasonable costs for copying or converting the requested documents to electronic format.

(3) The right of inspection created by this subdivision shall
 extend to the records of each subsidiary of a corporation subject to this subdivision.

(b) The inspection by a shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate may be made in person or by agent or attorney, and the right of inspection includes the right to copy and make extracts. The right of the shareholders to inspect the corporate records may not be limited by the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 29.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

Every director shall have the absolute right at any reasonable time to inspect and copy all books, records and documents of every kind and to inspect the physical properties of the corporation of which such person is a director and also of its subsidiary corporations, domestic or foreign. Such inspection by a director may be made in person or by agent or attorney and the right of inspection includes the right to copy and make extracts. This section applies to a director of any foreign corporation having its principal office in California or customarily holding meetings of its board in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 30.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

(a) Upon refusal of a lawful demand for inspection, the superior court of the proper county, may enforce the right of inspection with just and proper conditions or may, for good cause shown, appoint one or more competent inspectors or accountants to audit the books and records kept in this state and investigate the property, funds and affairs of any domestic corporation or any foreign corporation keeping records in this state and of any subsidiary corporation thereof, domestic or foreign, keeping records in this state and to report thereon in such manner as the court may direct.

(b) All
 officers and agents of the corporation shall produce to the inspectors or accountants so appointed all books and documents in their custody or power, under penalty of punishment for contempt of court.

(c) All expenses of the investigation or audit shall be defrayed by the applicant unless the court orders them to be paid or shared by the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

In any action or proceeding under Section 1600 or Section 1601, if the court finds the failure of the corporation to comply with a proper demand thereunder was without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the shareholder or holder of a voting trust certificate for the reasonable expenses incurred by such holder, including attorneys’ fees, in connection with such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

If any record subject to inspection pursuant to this chapter is not maintained in written form, a request for inspection is not complied with unless and until the corporation at its expense makes such record available in written form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Service of Process [1700. - 1702.]

1700.

In addition to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413. 10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, process may be served upon domestic corporations as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

Delivery by hand of a copy of any process against the corporation (a) to any natural person designated by it as agent or (b), if a corporate agent has been designated, to any person named in the latest certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 1505 at the office of such corporate agent shall constitute valid service on the corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

(a) If an agent for the purpose of service of process has resigned and has not been replaced or if the agent designated cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the address designated for personally delivering the process, or if no agent has been designated, and it is shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court that process against a domestic corporation cannot be served with reasonable diligence upon the designated agent by hand in the manner provided in Section 415.10, subdivision (a) of Section 415.20 or subdivision (a) of Section 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or upon the corporation in the manner provided in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 416.10 or subdivision (a) of Section
 416.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court may make an order that the service be made upon the corporation by delivering by hand to the Secretary of State, or to any person employed in the Secretary of State’s office in the capacity of assistant or deputy, one copy of the process for each defendant to be served, together with a copy of the order authorizing such service. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(b) Upon the receipt of any such copy of process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State shall give notice of the service of the process to the corporation at its principal office, by forwarding to such office, by registered mail with request for return receipt,
 the copy of the process or, if the records of the Secretary of State do not disclose an address for its principal office, by forwarding such copy in the same manner to the last designated agent for service of process who has not resigned. If the agent for service of process has resigned and has not been replaced and the records of the Secretary of State do not disclose an address for its principal office, no action need be taken by the Secretary of State.

(c) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State under this chapter and shall record therein the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with reference thereto. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the giving of notice thereof to
 the corporation and the forwarding of such process pursuant to this section, shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(d) The court order pursuant to subdivision (a) that service of process be made upon the corporation by delivery to the Secretary of State may be a court order of a court of another state, or of any federal court if the suit, action, or proceeding has been filed in that court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 31.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Involuntary Dissolution [1800. - 1809.]

1800.

(a) A verified complaint for involuntary dissolution of a corporation on any one or more of the grounds specified in subdivision (b) may be filed in the superior court of the proper county by any of the following persons:

(1) One-half or more of the directors in office.

(2) A shareholder or shareholders who hold shares representing not less than 3313 percent of (i) the total number of outstanding shares (assuming conversion of any preferred shares convertible into common shares) or (ii) the outstanding common shares or (iii) the equity of the corporation,
 exclusive in each case of shares owned by persons who have personally participated in any of the transactions enumerated in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), or any shareholder or shareholders of a close corporation.

(3) Any shareholder if the ground for dissolution is that the period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension thereof.

(4) Any other person expressly authorized to do so in the articles.

(b) The grounds for involuntary dissolution are that:

(1) The corporation has abandoned its business for more than one year.

(2) The corporation has an even number of directors who are equally divided and cannot agree as to the management of its affairs, so that
 its business can no longer be conducted to advantage or so that there is danger that its property and business will be impaired or lost, and the holders of the voting shares of the corporation are so divided into factions that they cannot elect a board consisting of an uneven number.

(3) There is internal dissension and two or more factions of shareholders in the corporation are so deadlocked that its business can no longer be conducted with advantage to its shareholders or the shareholders have failed at two consecutive annual meetings at which all voting power was exercised, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon election of their successors.

(4) Those in control of the corporation have been guilty of or have knowingly countenanced persistent and pervasive fraud, mismanagement or abuse of authority or persistent unfairness toward any
 shareholders or its property is being misapplied or wasted by its directors or officers.

(5) In the case of any corporation with 35 or fewer shareholders (determined as provided in Section 605), liquidation is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or interests of the complaining shareholder or shareholders.

(6) The period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension of such period.

(c) At any time prior to the trial of the action any shareholder or creditor may intervene therein.

(d) This section does not apply to any corporation subject to the Banking Law (Division
 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code), the Public Utilities Act (Part 1 (commencing with 201) of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code), the Savings
 Association Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Financial Code) or Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner of shares who has entered into an agreement under Section 300 or 706.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 4.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

(a) The Attorney General may bring an action against any domestic corporation or purported domestic corporation in the name of the people of this state, upon the Attorney General’s own information or upon complaint of a private party, to procure a judgment dissolving the corporation and annulling, vacating or forfeiting its corporate existence upon any of the following grounds:

(1) The corporation has seriously offended against any provision of the statutes regulating corporations.

(2) The corporation has fraudulently abused or
 usurped corporate privileges or powers.

(3) The corporation has violated any provision of law by any act or default which under the law is a ground for forfeiture of corporate existence.

(4) The corporation has failed to pay to the Franchise Tax Board for a period of five years any tax imposed upon it by the Bank and Corporation Tax Law.

(b) If the ground of the action is a matter or act which the corporation has done or omitted to do that can be corrected by amendment of its articles or by other corporate action, such suit shall not be maintained unless (1) the Attorney General, at least 30 days prior to the institution of suit, has given the corporation written notice of the matter or act done or omitted to be done and (2) the corporation has failed to institute proceedings to correct it within the 30-day period or
 thereafter fails to prosecute such proceedings.

(c) In any such action the court may order dissolution or such other or partial relief as it deems just and expedient. The court also may appoint a receiver for winding up the affairs of the corporation or may order that the corporation be wound up by its board subject to the supervision of the court.

(d) Service of process on the corporation may be made pursuant to Chapter 17 or by written notice to the president or secretary of the corporation at the address indicated in the corporation’s last tax return filed pursuant to the Bank and Corporation Tax Law. The Attorney General shall also publish one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the proper county a notice to the shareholders of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

If the ground for the complaint for involuntary dissolution of the corporation is a deadlock in the board as set forth in subdivision (b)(2) of Section 1800, the court may appoint a provisional director. The provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 308 apply to any such provisional director so appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

If, at the time of the filing of a complaint for involuntary dissolution or at any time thereafter, the court has reasonable grounds to believe that unless a receiver of the corporation is appointed the interests of the corporation and its shareholders will suffer pending the hearing and determination of the complaint, upon the application of the plaintiff, and after a hearing upon such notice to the corporation as the court may direct and upon the giving of security pursuant to Sections 566 and 567 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court may appoint a receiver to take over and manage the business and affairs of the corporation and to preserve its property pending the
 hearing and determination of the complaint for dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

After hearing the court may decree a winding up and dissolution of the corporation if cause therefor is shown or, with or without winding up and dissolution, may make such orders and decrees and issue such injunctions in the case as justice and equity require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.

(a) Involuntary proceedings for winding up a corporation commence when the order for winding up is entered under Section 1804.

(b) When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall conduct the winding up of the affairs of the corporation, subject to the supervision of the court, unless other persons are appointed by the court, on good cause shown, to conduct the winding up. The directors or such other persons may, subject to any restrictions imposed by the court, exercise all their powers through the executive officers without any order of court.

(c) When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to carry on business except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up thereof and except during such period as the board may deem necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale of its business or assets, or both, in whole or in part. The directors shall cause written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for involuntary winding up to be given by mail to all shareholders and to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation, unless the order for winding up has been stayed by appeal therefrom or otherwise or the proceeding or the execution of the order has been enjoined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has been commenced, the jurisdiction of the court includes:

(a) The requirement of the proof of all claims and demands against the corporation, whether due or not yet due, contingent, unliquidated or sounding only in damages, and the barring from participation of creditors and claimants failing to make and present claims and proof as required by any order.

(b) The determination or compromise of all claims of every nature against the corporation or any of its property, and the determination of the amount
 of money or assets required to be retained to pay or provide for the payment of claims. 

(c) The determination of the rights of shareholders and of all classes of shareholders in and to the assets of the corporation.

(d) The presentation and filing of intermediate and final accounts of the directors or other persons appointed to conduct the winding up and hearing thereon, the allowance, disallowance or settlement thereof and the discharge of the directors or such other persons from their duties and liabilities.

(e) The appointment of a commissioner to hear and determine any or all matters, with such power or authority as the court may deem proper.

(f) The filling of any vacancies on the board which the directors or shareholders are unable to fill.
